North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 24. Trust Companies and Interstate Trust Business.
§ 53-320.
Examinations; periodic reports; cooperative agreements; assessment of fees.

The Commissioner may examine any activity conducted through a trust office or representative trust office maintained in this State by an out-of-state trust institution to determine whether these activities are being conducted in compliance with the laws of this State and in accordance with safe and sound practices. The pertinent provisions of Part 4 of this Article shall apply to these examinations.

The Commissioner may require periodic reports regarding any out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative trust office in this State pursuant to this Subpart. The required reports shall be provided by the trust institution or by the home state regulator. Any reporting requirements shall be (i) consistent, to the extent practicable, with the reporting requirements applicable to State trust companies and (ii) appropriate for the purpose of enabling the Commissioner to carry out the Commissioner’s responsibilities under the provisions of this Article. The pertinent provisions of Part 4 of this Article shall apply to these reports.

The Commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating, and information-sharing agreements with bank supervisory agencies, including agreements arranged by an organization composed of, affiliated with, or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies, with respect to the periodic supervision and examination of any trust office or representative trust office of an out-of-state trust institution in this State, or any trust office or representative trust office of a State trust institution in any host state. The Commissioner may accept and rely upon a report of examination and report of investigation of a bank supervisory agency in lieu of conducting a separate examination or investigation.

The Commissioner may enter into agreements with any bank supervisory agency supervising (i) a State trust institution engaging in trust business outside this State or (ii) an out-of-state trust institution maintaining a trust office or representative trust office in this State to engage the services of the agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation or to provide the services of the Commissioner’s examiners to the agency at a reasonable rate of compensation. Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes does not apply to agreements authorized by this subsection. However, the Commissioner shall: (i) submit all proposed agreements or contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this subsection to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all agreements or contracts to be awarded by the Commissioner under this subsection a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Commissioner may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the agreement or contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Commissioner shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

The Commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with bank supervisory agencies supervising any trust office or representative trust office maintained in this State by an out-of-state trust institution or any trust office or representative trust office maintained by a State trust institution in any host state; provided, that the Commissioner may at any time take actions independently if the Commissioner considers the actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out the Commissioner’s responsibilities under the provisions of this Article or to ensure compliance with the laws of this State.

Each out-of-state trust institution that maintains one or more trust offices or representative trust offices in this State may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees as provided by rules of the Commissioner. The fees may be shared with bank supervisory agencies or any organization composed of, affiliated with, or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies as agreed between those bank supervisory agencies and organizations and the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 11; 2010-194, s. 2; 2011-326, s. 15(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 11, effective August 12, 2005, in subsection (a), inserted “activity conducted through a” preceding “trust office or representative” and substituted “these activities are being conducted” for “the trust office or representative trust office is being operated.”

Session Laws 2010-194, s. 2, effective October 1, 2010, and applicable to all contracts proposed or awarded on or after that date, added the last two sentences in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2011-326, s. 15(b), effective June 27, 2011, in the third sentence of subsection (d), deleted “statewide and agency term” following “proposed” and inserted “and after.”

§ 53-321.
Enforcement.

Consistent with Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commissioner may determine:

That activities of a trust office maintained by an out-of-state trust institution in this State are being conducted in violation of the laws of this State or any rule, order, or declaratory ruling issued by the Commissioner, or in an unsafe and unsound manner, or that the out-of-state trust institution does not meet or no longer meets the requirements of this Subpart for maintaining a trust office in this State; or

That an out-of-state trust institution is engaged in unauthorized trust activity.In either event, the Commissioner may take any enforcement actions the Commissioner would be authorized to take if the trust office or the out-of-state trust institution were a State trust company and may issue an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting the out-of-state trust institution from engaging in trust business in this State.

Consistent with Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commissioner may determine by order that an out-of-state trust institution maintaining a representative trust office in this State does not meet or no longer meets the requirements of this Subpart for maintaining a representative trust office in this State. The order shall be effective on the date of issuance or any other date the Commissioner determines.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the Commissioner may take any action permitted by subsection (a) or (b) of this section without notice or opportunity for hearing but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken.

The Commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home state regulator and any other bank supervisory agency supervising the out-of-state trust institution of each enforcement action taken against an out-of-state trust institution and may consult and cooperate with other bank supervisory agencies in pursuing and resolving the enforcement action.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 12.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 12, effective August 12, 2005, in subdivision (a)(1), inserted “activities of” and substituted “are being conducted” for “is being operated.”

§ 53-322.
Notice of transactions that cause a change in control.

Each out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative trust office in this State, or the home state regulator of the trust institution, shall give at least 30 days’ notice or, in the case of an emergency transaction or the cessation of trust activity in this State by an out-of-state trust institution or foreign trust institution whose only office in this State is a registered office, as much notice as practicable, to the Commissioner of:

Any merger, consolidation, share exchange, or other transaction that would cause a change in control of an out-of-state trust institution (i) that would be subject to Subpart D of Part 3 of this Article if the out-of-state trust institution were a State trust company or (ii) is required to be filed with any bank supervisory agency;

Any transfer of all or substantially all of the accounts or account assets of the out-of-state trust institution to another person; or

The closing, transfer, or discontinuance of any trust office or representative trust office in this State.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 13, effective August 12, 2005, inserted “or the cessation of trust activity in this State by an out-of-state trust institution or foreign trust institution whose only office in this State is a registered office” in the introductory language; and substituted “closing, transfer, or discontinuance” for “closing or transfer” in subdivision (3).

Subpart E. Foreign Trust Institution Trust Offices and Representative Trust Offices.

§ 53-323.
Foreign trust institution application for trust office or representative trust office.

Before establishing or acquiring and maintaining a trust office in this State, a foreign trust institution shall make application to the Commissioner for permission to do so in the English language and in the form required by the Commissioner. The application shall be preceded or accompanied by:

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of compliance with all applicable requirements of Article 15 of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes;

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner of compliance by the foreign trust institution with any applicable requirements of its home country regulator for maintenance of capital, for expansion within the borders of its home country or within a political subdivision of its home country, and for acquiring or establishing and maintaining the trust office in this State;

Evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner that the foreign trust institution is not in a hazardous condition;

Unless waived by the Commissioner, a copy of the resolution adopted by the board of directors of the foreign trust institution, or similar governing body or a duly-authorized committee thereof, authorizing the trust office; and

Payment of any fee set by rule.

The Commissioner may require any materials not written in the English language to be translated, and the translation certified in a manner satisfactory to the Commissioner, at the expense of the foreign trust institution.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 14, effective August 12, 2005; and inserted “all” for “any” in subdivision (1); and inserted “Unless waived by the Commissioner” in subdivision (4).

§ 53-324.
Conditions for approval.

A foreign trust institution may engage in trust business in this State only on approval by the Commissioner of an application described in

G.S. 53-323

, which may be given upon conditions required by the Commissioner for prudential reasons consistent with any applicable international agreements to which the United States is a party.

The Commissioner may deny approval of the application if the Commissioner finds that the foreign trust institution lacks sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the management, integrity, or reputation of the foreign trust institution does not justify approval. The Commissioner also may deny approval if the Commissioner is unable to determine from the application materials whether the foreign trust institution possesses sufficient resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or whether the management, integrity, or reputation of the foreign trust institution justifies approval.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 15.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 15, effective August 12, 2005, made a minor stylistic change in subsection (a).

§ 53-325.
Additional trust offices and representative trust offices.

A foreign trust institution that maintains a trust office in this State under the provisions of this Subpart may establish or acquire and maintain additional trust offices or representative trust offices in this State in the manner provided by

G.S. 53-319

for out-of-state trust institutions, except that the Commissioner may require any additional information and impose any additional conditions as the Commissioner deems necessary for prudential reasons consistent with any applicable international agreements to which the United States is a party.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-326.
Examinations; periodic reports; cooperative agreements; assessment of fees.

The Commissioner may examine any activity conducted through a trust office or representative trust office maintained in this State by a foreign trust institution to determine whether these activities are being conducted in compliance with the laws of this State and in accordance with safe and sound practices. The pertinent provisions of Part 4 of this Article shall apply to these examinations.

The Commissioner may require periodic reports regarding any foreign trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative trust office in this State. The required reports shall be provided in the English language by the trust institution or by its home country regulator. The reporting requirements shall be those the Commissioner considers appropriate for the purpose of enabling the Commissioner to carry out the Commissioner’s responsibilities under the provisions of this Article for prudential reasons consistent with any applicable international agreements to which the United States is a party. The pertinent provisions of Part 4 of this Article shall apply to these reports.

The Commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating, and information-sharing agreements with bank supervisory agencies supervising foreign trust institutions, including agreements arranged by an organization composed of, affiliated with, or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies, with respect to the periodic supervision and examination of any trust office or representative trust office of a foreign trust institution in this State, or any trust office or representative trust office of a State trust institution engaged in trust business or trust marketing in a foreign country. The Commissioner may accept and rely upon a report of examination and report of investigation of a bank supervisory agency in lieu of conducting a separate examination or investigation of a foreign trust institution.

The Commissioner may enter into agreements with bank supervisory agencies supervising (i) a State trust institution engaging in trust business in a foreign country or (ii) a foreign trust institution maintaining a trust office or representative trust office in this State to engage the services of the bank supervisory agency’s examiners at a reasonable rate of compensation or to provide the services of the Commissioner’s examiners to the bank supervisory agency at a reasonable rate of compensation. Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes does not apply to agreements authorized by this section. However, the Commissioner shall: (i) submit all proposed agreements or contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this subsection to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all agreements or contracts to be awarded by the Commissioner under this subsection a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Commissioner may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the agreement or contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Commissioner shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

The Commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint enforcement actions with bank supervisory agencies supervising any trust office or representative trust office maintained in this State by a foreign trust institution or any trust office or representative trust office maintained by a State trust institution in any foreign country; provided, that the Commissioner may at any time take actions independently if the Commissioner considers the actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out the Commissioner’s responsibilities under the provisions of this Article or to ensure compliance with the laws of this State.

Each foreign trust institution that maintains one or more trust offices or representative trust offices in this State may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory and examination fees as provided by rules of the Commissioner. The fees may be shared with bank supervisory agencies or with any organization composed of, affiliated with, or representing one or more bank supervisory agencies, as agreed between the bank supervisory agencies and organizations and the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 16; 2010-194, s. 3; 2011-326, s. 15(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 16, effective August 12, 2005, in subsection (a), inserted “activity conducted through a” preceding “examine any” and substituted “these activities are being conducted” for “the trust office or representative trust office is being operated.

Session Laws 2010-194, s. 3, effective October 1, 2010, and applicable to all contracts proposed or awarded on or after that date, added the last two sentences in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2011-326, s. 15(c), effective June 27, 2011, in the third sentence of subsection (d), deleted “statewide and agency term” following “proposed” and inserted “and after.”

§ 53-327.
Enforcement.

Consistent with Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commissioner may determine:

That activities of a trust office or representative trust office maintained by a foreign trust institution in this State are being conducted in violation of the laws of this State or any rule, order, or declaratory ruling issued by the Commissioner, or in an unsafe and unsound manner, or that the foreign trust institution does not meet or no longer meets the requirements of this Subpart for maintaining a trust office or representative trust office in this State; or

That a foreign trust institution is engaged in unauthorized trust activity.In either event, the Commissioner may take any enforcement actions the Commissioner would be authorized to take if the foreign trust institution were a State trust company and may issue an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting the foreign trust institution from engaging in trust business or trust marketing in this State.

Consistent with Article 3A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commissioner may determine by order that a foreign trust institution maintaining a representative trust office in this State does not meet or no longer meets the requirements of this Subpart for maintaining a representative trust office in this State. The order shall be effective on the date of issuance or any other date the Commissioner determines.

In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the Commissioner may take any action permitted by subsection (a) or (b) of this section without notice or opportunity for hearing but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon request to rescind the action taken.

The Commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home country regulator and any other bank supervisory agency supervising the foreign trust institution of each enforcement action taken against a foreign trust institution and may consult and cooperate with bank supervisory agencies in pursuing and resolving the enforcement action.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 17.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 17, effective August 12, 2005, in subdivision (a)(1), inserted “activities of” preceding “a trust office” and substituted “are being conducted” for “is being operated.”

§ 53-328.
Notice of transactions that cause a change in control.

Each foreign trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative trust office in this State, or the home country regulator of the foreign trust institution, shall give at least 30 days’ notice (or, in the case of an emergency transaction or the cessation of trust activity in this State by an out-of-state trust institution or foreign trust institution whose only office in this State is a registered office, as much notice as practicable) to the Commissioner, in the form required by the Commissioner, of:

Any merger, consolidation, share exchange, or other transaction that would cause a change of control of a foreign trust institution:

That would be subject to Subpart D of Part 3 of this Article if the foreign trust institution were a State trust company; or

Is required to be filed with any bank supervisory agency;

Any transfer of all or substantially all of the accounts or account assets of the foreign trust institution to another person; or

The closing, transfer, or discontinuance of any trust office or representative trust office in this State.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2005-269, s. 18.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-269, s. 18, effective August 12, 2005, inserted “or the cessation of trust activity in this State by an out-of-state trust institution or foreign trust institution whose only office in this State is a registered office” in the introductory language; and substituted “closing, transfer, or discontinuance” for “closing or transfer” in subdivision (3).

§ 53-329.
International agreements.

If any provision of this Article concerning foreign trust institutions, or the application of that provision, is found by any competent adjudicatory body to violate any international agreement to which the United States is a party, the provision shall be deemed modified only to the extent and only in the particular circumstances necessary to make the provision as modified comply with the international agreement, and the remaining provisions of this Article shall not be affected and shall continue to apply to foreign trust institutions.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Part 3. State Trust Company Charter Act.

Subpart A. General.

§ 53-330.
Title and purposes.

This Part may be cited as the State Trust Company Charter Act.

It is the express intent of this Part to provide for the chartering of trust companies apart from the provisions of Article 2 of this Chapter and to permit trust companies to engage in trust business subject to the provisions of this Article.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

Subpart B. Organization and Powers of State Trust Company.

§ 53-331.
Organization and powers of State trust company.

Subject to the other provisions of this Part, one or more persons may organize and charter a State trust company, which may be established in the manner described in this Part and in no other way.

Subject to

G.S. 53-313

and G.S. 53-336(b) and other applicable provisions of State and federal law, a State trust company may:

Act as a fiduciary within or outside this State;

Act within or outside this State as agent, advisory agent, assignee, assignee for the benefit of creditors, attorney-in-fact, authenticating agent, bailee, bond or indenture trustee, conservator, conversion agent, curator, custodian, escrow agent, exchange agent, fiscal or paying agent, financial adviser, investment adviser, investment manager, managing agent, purchase agent, receiver, registrar, safekeeping agent, subscription agent, transfer agent, warrant agent, or in similar capacities generally performed by corporate trustees, and in so acting to possess, purchase, sell, invest, reinvest, safekeep, or otherwise manage or administer real or personal property of other persons;

Engage in trust marketing within this State; and

Exercise the powers of a business corporation organized under North Carolina law and any incidental powers that are reasonably necessary to enable it to fully exercise, in accordance with commonly accepted fiduciary customs and usages, a power conferred in this Article.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2011-339, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-339, s. 9, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to all trusts created before, on, or after that date, substituted “established” for “incorporated” in subsection (a).

§ 53-332.
Articles of incorporation of State trust company.

The articles of incorporation of a State trust company shall be signed and acknowledged by or on behalf of each organizer and shall contain:

The information required to be set forth in G.S. 55-2-02(a) and, except for telephone information, G.S. 53-311(c); and

Any provision consistent with G.S. 55-2-02(b) and other applicable law that the organizers elect to set forth in the articles of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of the State trust company.

The Commissioner may allow a State trust company to be organized as a company other than a corporation, and, in such case, references in this Article to provisions of Chapter 55 of the General Statutes shall refer to analogous provisions of law governing the formation and operation of that State trust company.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2011-339, s. 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-339, s. 10, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to all trusts created before, on, or after that date, added the subsection (a) designation; and added subsection (b).

§ 53-333.
Application for State trust company charter and permission to incorporate State trust company.

An application for a State trust company charter and permission to incorporate the State trust company shall be made to the Commissioner in the form required by the Commissioner and shall be supported by information, data, and records that the Commissioner requires. The application shall be accompanied by the fee set by the Commissioner by rule.

Upon receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall at once conduct an examination of all relevant facts connected with the formation of the proposed State trust company. The Commissioner may consider the following factors:

The proposed market or markets to be served;

Whether the proposed organizational and capital structure and the amount of initial capital appear adequate in relation to the proposed business and market or markets;

Whether the anticipated volume and nature of business indicate a reasonable probability of success and profitability based on the market or markets proposed to be served;

Whether the proposed officers and directors, as a group, have sufficient experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed State trust company will be free from improper or unlawful influence and otherwise will operate in compliance with law, and that success of the proposed State trust company is reasonably probable; and

Whether the proposed name of the proposed State trust company is likely to mislead the public as to its character or purpose or is the same as a name already adopted by an existing bank, savings association, or trust institution in this State, or so similar thereto as to be likely to mislead the public.

The failure of an applicant to furnish required information, data, other material, or the required fee within 30 days after a request may be considered an abandonment of the application.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-334.
Notice and investigation of charter application.

The Commissioner shall notify the organizers when the application is complete and accepted for filing and all required fees have been paid.

The Commissioner shall investigate the application and inquire into the identity and character of each proposed director, officer, and principal shareholder. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, information in the application bearing on the character, or information about the personal finances, of an existing or proposed organizer, officer, director, or shareholder is confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-335.
Decision on charter application and hearing.

The Commissioner, based on the application and investigation described in this Subpart, shall enter an order approving or denying approval of the application.

If the Commissioner orders that the proposed State trust company may be formed, the Commissioner shall issue a State trust company charter and a certification to the Secretary of State permitting the establishment of the State trust company. The Commissioner may make approval of any application conditional and shall include any conditions in the order granting the charter.

Any order entered by the Commissioner with respect to a charter application shall be subject to review by the Commission for entry of final agency decision.

History.

2001-263, s. 1; 2011-339, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-339, s. 11, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to all trusts created before, on, or after that date, substituted “establishment” for “incorporation” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

§ 53-336.
Issuance of charter.

A proposed State trust company shall not be incorporated or engage in trust business or trust marketing until it receives a charter issued by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall not issue the charter until the State trust company certifies that it has:

Received cash or United States government securities having a market value on the date of capitalization in at least the full amount of required initial capital from subscriptions for the issuance of shares;

Elected the initial officers and directors named in the application for charter or other officers and directors approved by the Commissioner; and

Complied with all other requirements of this Subpart relative to the organization of a State trust company.

The charter issued by the Commissioner shall set forth the trust powers of the State trust company, which may be stated as:

All powers granted to a State trust company in this State; or

Specific powers that the State trust company chooses and is authorized by the Commissioner to exercise.

If a State trust company does not open and engage in trust business within six months after the date it receives its charter, or within such further period as may be extended by the Commissioner, the Commissioner may cancel the charter.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-337.
Required initial capital.

The Commissioner shall not issue a charter to a proposed State trust company having initial capital of less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The Commissioner may require additional initial capital for a proposed State trust company if the Commissioner finds the proposed scope or type of operation of a proposed State trust company requires additional initial capital for the safe and sound operation of the State trust company. The Commissioner may reduce the amount of minimum initial capital required for a proposed State trust company if the Commissioner finds the proposed scope or type of operation of a proposed State trust company may be formed with reduced initial capital consistent with the safe and sound operation of the State trust company. The safety and soundness factors to be considered by the Commissioner in the exercise of the Commissioner’s discretion include:

The nature and type of business proposed to be conducted;

The nature and liquidity of assets proposed to be held in a corporate capacity;

The amount of fiduciary assets projected to be under management;

The type of fiduciary assets proposed to be held and the proposed depository of the assets;

The complexity of fiduciary duties and degree of discretion proposed to be undertaken;

The competence and experience of proposed management;

The extent and adequacy of proposed internal controls;

The proposed presence or absence of annual unqualified audits by an independent certified public accountant;

The reasonableness of business plans for retaining or acquiring additional equity capital; and

The existence and adequacy of insurance proposed to be obtained by the trust company for the purpose of protecting its clients, beneficiaries, and grantors.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-338.
Subordinated notes or debentures.

The amount of any outstanding notes or debentures that are subordinated to creditors or classes of creditors of the State trust company may be treated as equity capital of the State trust company for purposes of determining equity capital adequacy, hazardous condition, or insolvency, and for other purposes, as provided by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-339.
Application of laws relating to general business corporations.

Chapter 55 of the General Statutes applies to a State trust company to the extent not inconsistent with this Article. Except for the filing of annual reports and statement of change of registered agent or registered office, unless expressly authorized by this Article or a rule adopted by the Commission, a State trust company shall not take an action authorized by Chapter 55 of the General Statutes that requires a filing with the Secretary of State without first obtaining the approval of the Commissioner.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-340.
Investment in State trust company facilities.

A State trust company may invest in one or more State trust company facilities consistent with the safe and sound operation of a State trust company.

For the purposes of this Part, “State trust company facility” means real estate owned, or leased to the extent the lease or the leasehold improvements are capitalized, by a State trust company for the purposes of:

Providing space for State trust company employees, officers, and directors to perform their duties and space for appropriate parking;

Conducting trust business, including meeting the reasonable needs and convenience of the State trust company’s customers, employees, officers, and directors, and providing for necessary computer operations, data processing, maintenance, and record retention and storage;

Future expansion of the State trust company’s facilities; or

Conducting another activity authorized by law or by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner.

Without the approval of the Commissioner, a State trust company shall not, within the first three years following issuance of its charter, directly or indirectly, invest an amount in excess of one-half of its initial capital in State trust company facilities, furniture, fixtures, and equipment. Except as otherwise provided by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner, in computing this limitation, a State trust company shall include:

Its direct investment in State trust company facilities;

Any investment in a company with an interest in a State trust company facility;

Any indebtedness incurred on State trust company facilities by an affiliate of the State trust company.Except as otherwise provided by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner, in computing this limitation, a State trust company may exclude an amount included under subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection to the extent any lease of a facility from the company holding title to the facility is capitalized by the State trust company.

Real estate acquired under subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of this section ceases to be a State trust company facility if it is not used for a purpose listed in subdivision (1), (2), or (4) of subsection (b) of this section on the third anniversary of the date of its acquisition unless the Commissioner grants approval to hold the real estate for a longer period.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.

§ 53-341.
Other real estate.

A State trust company shall not acquire real estate other than a State trust company facility for its own account except:

Securitized interests in real estate and obligations secured by real estate;

As necessary to avoid or minimize a loss on an investment previously made in good faith; or

As provided by rules, orders, or declaratory rulings of the Commissioner.

To the extent reasonably necessary to avoid or minimize loss on real estate acquired as permitted by subsection (a) of this section or under

G.S. 53-340

, a State trust company may exchange real estate for other real estate or personal property, invest additional funds in or improve such real estate, or acquire additional real estate.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a State trust company shall dispose of any real estate acquired as permitted by subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section or under

G.S. 53-340

:

In the case of real estate acquired under subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of this section, on or before the fifth anniversary of:

The date it was acquired; or

The date it ceases to be used as a State trust company facility if it began to be so used after its acquisition.

In the case of real estate acquired under

G.S. 53-340

, on or before the third anniversary of the date it ceases to be a State trust company facility as provided by G.S. 53-340.

The Commissioner may grant one or more extensions of time for disposing of real estate if the Commissioner determines that:

The State trust company has made a good faith effort to dispose of the real estate and has been unable to do so on reasonably advantageous terms; or

Disposal of the real estate otherwise would be detrimental to the State trust company.

History.

2001-263, s. 1.